Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1143
Assistant; certification required.

Any person who assists a dentist in the administration of general anesthesia, deep sedation, moderate sedation, or minimal sedation shall be currently certified in basic life-support skills or the equivalent thereof.

Laws 1986, LB 438, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-193.33;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 476;

Laws 2015, LB80, § 13.